Oklahoma, session 2025, SB580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 18 O.S. 2021, Section 1142, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1142. FILING AND OTHER SERVICE FEES


A. The Secretary of State, for services performed in the Office


of the Secretary of State and for expense of mailing, shall charge


and collect the following fees:


1. For any report, document, or other paper required to be


filed in the Office of the Secretary of State, a fee of Twenty-five


Dollars ($25.00);


2. For reservation of corporate name, a fee of Ten Dollars


($10.00);



Req. No. 935 Page 1


3. For issuing extra copies of any certificate not requiring


any extra filing of papers or documents of any kind, a fee of Ten


Dollars ($10.00);


4. For issuing any other certificate, a fee of Ten Dollars


($10.00);


5. For receiving a filing or indexing the annual certificate of


a foreign corporation doing business in this state, or both when


filed together, a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00);


6. For preclearance of any document for filing, a fee of Fifty


Dollars ($50.00);


7. For each service of process made upon and accepted by the


Secretary of State, a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00);


8. For preparing and providing a report of a record search, a


fee of Five Dollars ($5.00);


9. For filing and issuing certificates of incorporation, the


fee shall be one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) of the authorized


capital stock of such corporation; provided, that the minimum fee


for any such service shall be Fifty Dollars ($50.00); provided


further, that not-for-profit corporations shall only be required to


pay a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00);


10. For filing and issuing amended certificates of


incorporation or certificates of restatement, reorganization,


revival, extension or dissolution, the fee shall be Fifty Dollars


($50.00); provided, however, not-for-profit corporations shall only

Req. No. 935 Page 2


be required to pay a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). If an


amendment shall provide for an increase in authorized capital in


excess of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), the filing fee shall


be an amount equal to one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) of such


increase;


11. For filing and issuing certificates of consolidation, if


the resulting corporation is a domestic corporation, or merger, if


the surviving corporation is a domestic corporation, the fee shall


be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00); provided, however, not-for-profit


corporations shall only be required to pay a fee of Twenty-five


Dollars ($25.00). If the merger or consolidation shall increase the


authorized capital of the surviving or resulting corporation in


excess of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), the filing fee shall


be an amount equal to one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) of such


increase;


12. For filing and issuing a certificate of conversion,


whenever the resulting corporation is a domestic corporation, the


minimum fee shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00); provided,


however, if the certificate of incorporation of the resulting


corporation authorizes capital stock in excess of Fifty Thousand


Dollars ($50,000.00), the filing fee shall be an amount equal to


one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) of such authorized capital.


If the resulting domestic corporation is not for profit, it shall


only be required to pay a fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00);

Req. No. 935 Page 3


13. For issuing a certificate to a foreign corporation to do


business in this state, and filing a certificate and statement of


such corporation required pursuant to the provisions of Section 1130


of this title, the fee shall be one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of


1%) of the maximum amount of capital invested by such corporation in


the state at any time during the fiscal year such certificate is


issued to any such foreign corporation; provided, that the minimum


fee for any such service shall be Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00);


provided further, that no such corporation shall be required to pay


a fee on an amount in excess of its authorized capital;


14. For amended certificate of qualification of a foreign


corporation, a fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00); provided,


however, for a certificate solely reflecting a change of mailing


address, a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00);


15. For filing a certificate of consolidation, if the resulting


corporation is a foreign corporation, or merger, if the surviving


corporation is a foreign corporation, the fee shall be One Hundred


Dollars ($100.00);


16. For filing a certificate of withdrawal of a foreign


corporation doing business in this state, a fee of One Hundred


Dollars ($100.00);


17. Every foreign corporation on the anniversary of its


qualification in this state each year, shall cause to be filed with


the Secretary of State a certificate of its president, vice-

Req. No. 935 Page 4


president or other managing officers, in which shall be stated and


shown the maximum amount of capital the corporation had invested in


the state at any time subsequent to the issuance to it of a


certificate to do business in this state and the amount of capital


previously paid upon. If the amount of capital so invested as shown


by said certificate exceeds the amount formerly paid upon, the


corporation, at the time of filing said certificate, shall pay to


the Secretary of State an additional fee equal to one-tenth of one


percent (1/10 of 1%) of the amount of such excess capital so


invested by the corporation in the state; provided, that no such


corporation shall be required to pay a filing fee on an amount in


excess of its authorized capital, or to file the certificate


provided for in this paragraph after it shall have paid a filing fee


on its total authorized capitalization;


18. For acting as the registered agent, a fee of One Hundred


Dollars ($100.00) payable on the first day of July each year, and if


not paid before the next ensuing September 1st, the Oklahoma Tax


Commission Secretary of State shall suspend and forfeit the charter


of the delinquent corporation pursuant to the procedures prescribed


in Section 1212 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The Tax


Commission Secretary of State shall collect and audit the registered


agent fee authorized pursuant to this paragraph in conjunction with


the collection and audit of franchise taxes as provided for in


Sections 1201 through 1214 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 935 Page 5


All monies received by the Tax Commission Secretary of State


pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph shall be paid to the


State Treasurer for deposit in the General Revenue Fund;


19. For filing a change of address for any individual,


corporation, limited liability company or limited partnership


designated by a corporation as its registered agent for service of


process, or for the change of name or the resignation of a


registered agent, a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), for the


first forty corporations and Five Dollars ($5.00) for each


additional corporation within any bulk filing; and


20. For any response by means of telecommunications to


inquiries regarding information required to be maintained by the


Secretary of State, a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00), unless otherwise


provided. Fees collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be


deposited in the Revolving Fund for the Office of the Secretary of


State.


B. Except as otherwise provided by law, fees paid to the


Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma


General Corporation Act shall be properly accounted for and shall be


paid monthly to the State Treasurer for deposit in the General


Revenue Fund.


C. For any certificate supplied by the county clerk, such clerk


shall receive a fee of One Dollar ($1.00). Such fees shall be


properly accounted for and shall be paid into the county treasury in

Req. No. 935 Page 6


the same manner as other fees collected by the county clerk for the


filing and recording of mortgages and deeds.


D. In any court proceeding pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma General Corporation Act requiring the filing of any decree,


order, report or other document in the Office of the Secretary of


State or in the office of any county clerk, in addition to the usual


court costs and the costs for filing in the office of the clerk of


the court, fees equal to the amounts provided for in this section


for such required filing shall be collected as costs in such


proceedings and such amount shall be forwarded to the Secretary of


State and the county clerk with the papers to be filed.


E. The provisions contained in this section relating to the


payment of incorporation fees by foreign corporations are not


intended and shall not be construed to relieve such corporations,


where applicable, of the payment of the annual corporate franchise


tax to the Tax Commission.


F. For the purposes of computing the fees to be collected by


the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this section,


each share without par value shall be treated the same as a share


with a par value of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), and the fees thereon


shall be collected accordingly.


G. Payments for any required fees except as otherwise provided


by law may be made as follows:



Req. No. 935 Page 7


1. By the applicant’s personal or company check, cash, or money


order; or


2. By a nationally recognized credit card issued to the


applicant. The Secretary of State may add a convenience fee, not to


exceed four percent (4%) of the amount of such payment for services


provided through telephonic or electronic media. For purposes of


this paragraph, “nationally recognized credit card” means any


instrument or device, whether known as a credit card, credit plate,


charge plate, or by any other name, issued with or without fee by an


issuer for the use of the cardholder in obtaining goods, services,


or anything else of value on credit which is accepted by over one


thousand merchants in this state. The Secretary of State shall


determine which nationally recognized credit cards will be accepted;


provided, however, the Secretary of State must ensure that no loss


of state revenue will occur by the use of such card. The


convenience fee collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be


credited to the Revolving Fund for the Office of the Secretary of


State, as established in Section 276.1 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-935 QD 1/19/2025 5:39:09 AM





Req. No. 935 Page 8